Missouri, session 2026, SB1469.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 208, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 208.149, to read as
follows:
208.149. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Clinical pathology services", professional
medical services provided by a pathologist for the
examination, diagnosis, and interpretation of laboratory
tests performed on patient specimens to aid in the diagnosis
and treatment of disease. Clinical pathology services
include, but are not limited to, hematology, microbiology,
immunology, clinical chemistry, molecular pathology, and
other laboratory-based diagnostic procedures;
(2) "Hospital-based pathologist", a licensed physician
specializing in pathology who provides clinical pathology
services within a hospital setting;
(3) "Professional component of clinical pathology
services", the portion of clinical pathology services that
involves the pathologist's professional expertise in

SB 1469 2
interpreting and supervising laboratory tests, excluding the
technical component of performing the laboratory tests.
2. The fee for the professional component of clinical
pathology services shall be paid by MO HealthNet for
professional services provided by a hospital-based
pathologist for inpatient clinical pathology services
rendered to patients covered by the MO HealthNet program.
3. The reimbursement amount for the professional
component of clinical pathology services shall be set at
thirty percent of the approved outpatient simplified fee
schedule based on Medicare's clinical laboratory fee
schedule for the corresponding clinical pathology services
payable by MO HealthNet.
4. (1) If the fee for the professional component of
clinical pathology services is paid for professional
services provided by a pathologist employed by the hospital
where the clinical pathology services are rendered to
covered MO HealthNet patients, the professional fee shall be
paid directly to the hospital.
(2) If the fee for the professional component of
clinical pathology services is paid for professional
services provided by a pathologist who is not employed by
the hospital where clinical pathology services are rendered
to covered MO HealthNet patients, the professional fee shall
be paid directly to the third party providing the services.
5. The department of social services shall promulgate
all necessary rules and regulations for the administration
of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under
the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of
the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section

SB 1469 3
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓